apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="schl/ofen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ofe</l>       <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>ofe</l>       <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éifs</l>      <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éift</l>      <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ofe</l>       <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ooft</l>      <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ofe</l>       <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>of</l>        <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ooft</l>      <r>ofen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/sinn__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>bass</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ass</l>       <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sidd</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>si</l>        <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>wier</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wiers</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wier</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wiere</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wiert</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>wiere</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>war</l>       <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>waars</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>war</l>       <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ware</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>waart</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ware</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>sief</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sieft</l>     <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>sidd</l>      <r>sinn<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spä/ren__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ert</l>       <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ert</l>       <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ert</l>       <r>ren<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sta/men__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ams</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amt</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amt</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>        <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>m</l>         <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>amt</l>       <r>men<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/oen__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>oe</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <!-- requires separate pp -->

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ees</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eet</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nn"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éings</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éing</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éingt</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éinge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungs</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oung</l>      <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oungt</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ounge</l>     <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>éi</l>        <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itt</l>       <r>oen<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="schlofen">        <i>schl</i><par n="schl/ofen__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sinn">            <i></i><par n="/sinn__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spären">          <i>spä</i><par n="spä/ren__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stamen">          <i>sta</i><par n="sta/men__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stoen">           <i>st</i><par n="st/oen__vblex"/></e>
